Hawaii statutes.
§334-60.3 Initiation of proceeding for
involuntary hospitalization. (a) Any person may file a petition alleging
that a person located in the county meets the criteria for commitment to a
psychiatric facility. The petition shall be executed subject to the penalties
of perjury but need not be sworn to before a notary public. The attorney
general, the attorney general's deputy, special deputy, or appointee designated
to present the case shall assist the petitioner to state the substance of the
petition in plain and simple language. The petition may be accompanied by a
certificate of the licensed physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or
psychologist who has examined the person within two days before submission of
the petition, unless the person whose commitment is sought has refused to
submit to medical or psychological examination, in which case the fact of
refusal shall be alleged in the petition. The certificate shall set forth the
signs and symptoms relied upon by the physician, advanced practice registered
nurse, or psychologist to determine the person is in need of care or treatment,
or both, and whether or not the person is capable of realizing and making a
rational decision with respect to the person's need for treatment. If the
petitioner believes that further evaluation is necessary before commitment, the
petitioner may request such further evaluation.

(b) In the event the subject of the petition
has been given an examination, evaluation, or treatment in a psychiatric
facility within five days before submission of the petition, and
hospitalization is recommended by the staff of the facility, the petition may
be accompanied by the administrator’s certificate in lieu of a physician’s or
psychologist’s certificate. [L 1984, c 188, pt of §3; gen ch 1985; am L 1994, c
58, §2; am L 2015, c 27, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next